Utah statutes.
36-23-104.   Committee meetings -- Compensation -- Quorum -- Legislative rules.

(1)  The committee may meet as needed, at the call of the committee chairs, to carry out the duties set forth in Section 36-23-106.

(2)  A public member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

(3) (a)  Five members of the committee constitute a quorum.

(b)  If a quorum is present, the action of a majority of members present is the action of the committee.

(4)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), in conducting all its business, the committee shall comply with the rules of legislative interim committees regarding motions.

